Hawaii statutes.
§372-5 Powers and duties of
director. The director shall:

(1) Establish standards of apprenticeship and for
apprenticeship agreements in conformity with this chapter;

(2) Provide assistance for the development of
on-the-job training programs in nonapprenticeable occupations;

(3) Encourage and promote apprenticeship in
apprenticeable occupations, including occupations in high growth and high
demand industries;

(4) Approve and register apprenticeship programs and
apprenticeship agreements which conform to the standards established by this
chapter;

(5) Keep records of apprenticeship agreements and
upon performance thereof issue certificates of completion of apprenticeship;

(6) Terminate or cancel apprenticeship agreements in
accordance with the agreements, and deregister apprenticeship programs;

(7) Bring about the settlement of differences arising
out of the apprenticeship agreement where the differences cannot be otherwise
adjusted locally;

(8) Issue such rules and regulations as may be
necessary to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter;

(9) Appoint personnel as are necessary in the
execution of the functions required under this chapter;

(10) Perform other duties as are necessary to carry
out the intent and purpose of this chapter or rules pertaining to
apprenticeship; and

(11) Accord reciprocal approval to apprenticeship
programs and agreements that are registered in other states by the federal
Office of Apprenticeship or a recognized agency of a state if such reciprocity
is requested by the apprenticeship program sponsor. Program sponsors seeking
reciprocal approval shall meet the wage and hour provisions and apprentice
ratio standards of this State. [L Sp 1941, c 23, pt of §1; am L 1943, c 158,
§1; RL 1945, §4142; RL 1955, §89-5; am L 1963, c 55, §1; am L 1967, c 20,
§1(d); HRS §372-5; am L 2012, c 14, §6]

Cross References

Rules, see chapter 91 and §371-7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next